Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201666-902.01
Decommissioning security, defined.

Decommissioning security
means a security instrument that is posted or given by a wind developer to
a municipality or other governmental entity to ensure sufficient funding is
available for removal of a wind energy conversion system and reclamation at
the end of the useful life of such a system.

Laws 2012, LB828, § 3.